Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4037.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 2501. As used in this part:
(a) "Commission" means the health information technology
commission created under section 2503.
(b) "Department" means the department of community health and
human services.
(c) "Health data utility" means a system that is operated by
the health information exchange and that does all of the following:
(i) Combines and facilitates the exchange of disparate clinical
LEP H00858'25 (H-2) 1zno9s


and other health data for treatment, care coordination, quality
improvement, population health, public health emergencies, and
other public health and community health purposes.
(ii) Provides trusted data sharing organizations identified
under subparagraph (vi) with access to data to support care
coordination among participants.
(iii) Provides a variety of technical services from which a
participant may select to allow for the exchange of information
using multiple modalities, including, but not limited to, query
searches and push notifications.
(iv) Promotes interoperability between health care entities,
this state, and other participants.
(v) Is patient-centered and market-driven.
(vi) Identifies trusted data sharing organizations and only
allows those organizations to access and submit data.
(vii) Ensures that the access to and submission of data
complies with the laws of this state and federal laws related to
health information.
(d) "Health information exchange" means the nonprofit entity
that operates an inclusive health information technology
infrastructure in this state that serves as a health data
aggregator and that is enabled to collect, normalize, and share
disparate health data content from a diverse set of health data
sources.
Sec. 2505. (1) The commission shall, in consultation with the
department, do each of the following:
(a) Develop and maintain a strategic plan in accordance with
subsection (2) to guide the implementation of an interoperable
health information technology system data utility that will reduce
LEP H00858'25 (H-2) 1zno9s


reduces medical errors, improve improves quality of care, and
produce produces greater value for health care expenditures.
(b) Identify critical technical, scientific, economic, and
other critical issues affecting the public and private adoption of
health information technology.
(c) Provide recommendations on policies and measures necessary
to achieve widespread adoption of health information technology.
(d) Increase the public's understanding of health information
technology.
(e) Promote more efficient and effective communication among
multiple health care providers, including, but not limited to,
hospitals, physicians, payers, employers, pharmacies, laboratories,
and any other health care related entity.
(f) Identify strategies to improve the ability to monitor
community health status.
(g) Develop or design any other initiatives in furtherance of
the commission's purpose.
(h) Annually, report and make recommendations to the
chairpersons of the standing committees of the house of
representatives and senate with jurisdiction over issues pertaining
to community health and information technology, the house of
representatives and senate appropriations subcommittees on
community health and information technology, and the senate and
house fiscal agencies.
(i) Perform any and all other activities in furtherance of the
above the actions under subdivisions (a) to (h) or as directed by
the department or the department of information technology,
technology, management, and budget, or both.
(2) The strategic plan developed pursuant to under subsection
LEP H00858'25 (H-2) 1zno9s


(1)(a) shall must include, at a minimum, each of the following:
(a) The development or adoption of health care information
technology standards and strategies.
(b) The ability to base medical decisions on the availability
of information at the time and place of care.
(c) The use of evidence-based medical care.
(d) Measures to protect the privacy and security of personal
health information.
(e) Measures to prevent unauthorized access to health
information.
(f) Measures to ensure accurate patient identification.
(g) Methods to facilitate secure patient access to health
information.
(h) Measures to reduce health care costs by addressing
inefficiencies, redundancy in data capture and storage, medical
errors, inappropriate care, incomplete information, and
administrative, billing, and data collection costs.
(i) Incorporating health information technology into the
provision of care and the organization of the health care
workplace.
(j) The ability to identify priority areas in which health
information technology can provide benefits to consumers and a
recommended timeline for implementation.
(k) Measurable outcomes.
Sec. 2508. (1) In accordance with the management and budget
act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, and no later than March
1, 2026, a request for proposal must be issued to select an
established, Michigan-based health information exchange that
operates throughout this state to operate a health data utility in
LEP H00858'25 (H-2) 1zno9s


this state. At a minimum, the request for proposal and any
resulting contract must require the health information exchange to
comply with all the federal laws and the laws of this state that
pertain to cyber security and data protection.
(2) The health information exchange selected under subsection
(1) must meet all of the following requirements:
(a) Is able to route relevant real-time data throughout this
state.
(b) Is able to allow health-focused programs access to
relevant data to improve health care services in compliance with
federal law and the laws of this state.
(c) Is able to improve the quality of health care in this
state by increasing public health monitoring efforts, incorporating
public health data into electronic records, and allowing for the
coordination of care in clinical and social decision-making
efforts.
(d) Complies with all applicable federal laws and the laws of
this state regarding standards-based health data exchange,
including, but not limited to, adherence to cybersecurity and data
protection requirements required by law.
(e) Has a governing board with representatives that have
expertise in public health or are associated with the department,
the commission, a hospital, a health plan, a human services
organization, a physician organization, or a pharmacy.
(f) Maintains a high-level of cybersecurity standards,
including, but not limited to, a certification from HITRUST
Alliance or a similar certification that, through a third-party
assessment, requires an organization to demonstrate compliance with
Common Security Framework (CSF) and requires adherence to industry
LEP H00858'25 (H-2) 1zno9s


best practices and standards.
(g) Is a nonprofit, Michigan-based health information exchange
that operates throughout this state and has technical connections
to a significant percentage of health care providers, public health
agencies, and payors in this state.
(h) Has a technology infrastructure that includes all of the
following to provide a high-level of protection of patient data:
(i) Advanced identity management.
(ii) Patient consent management that allows the patient to
manage the patient's consent practices.
(iii) Patient matching.
(iv) Strict audit logs and role-based access controls that
include, but are not limited to, both of the following protections
for all patients:
(A) The ability to request an accounting of disclosures.
(B) Access to reporting mechanisms to review data access logs.
(i) Provides all patients, through a clear and conspicuous
process, the ability to opt out of data sharing through the health
data utility at any time.
(j) On the request of a patient or, if a patient is unable to
participate in medical treatment decisions, the patient's patient
advocate, provides the patient or the patient advocate, at no cost,
with a record of the disclosures of protected health information
that were made during the 6 years preceding the request.
Final Page
LEP H00858'25 (H-2) 1zno9s